Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 3

Prohibited Practices

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 10: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the repeal of the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States has created an emergency which requires immediate control of intoxicating liquors; and

“Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for the maintenance and development of the State Government and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be effective on its passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

3-3-101. Accessories guilty as principals.

Every person knowingly aiding or abetting any person, firm, or corporation in the violation of any section of this act shall be deemed a principal and punished as such.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 6, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 14137; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-939.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1935, No. 108, codified as §§3-1-101 —3-1-103,3-2-101,3-2-205,3-3-101 —3-3-103,3-3-212,3-3-401,3-3-404,3-3-405,3-4-101 —3-4-103,3-4-201,3-4-202,3-4-207 —3-4-211,3-4-213,3-4-214,3-4-215 [repealed],3-4-217,3-4-219,3-4-220,3-4-301 —3-4-303,3-4-501,3-4-503,3-4-601 —3-4-605,3-8-301,3-8-302 [repealed],3-8-303,3-8-304 [repealed],3-8-305 —3-8-310,3-8-311 [repealed],3-8-313 —3-8-317,23-12-708.

3-3-102. Sentences and fines.

(a)

When a jail sentence is inflicted as part of the punishment, all persons convicted under this act shall serve out the sentence at hard labor.

(b)

All fines and costs assessed against any person under this act and not paid or replevied shall be served out by confinement at hard labor at the rate of one (1) day for each one dollar ($1.00) of the fine and costs.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 6, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 14139; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-941.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-3-101.

3-3-103. Multiple offenses — Bonds for good behavior.

(a)

Upon a second or any subsequent conviction or bond forfeiture for any violation of any alcoholic beverage control law of this state pertaining to the control, regulation, and handling of spirituous, vinous, malt liquors or beverages, or any amendment to any existing law or any new law on the same subject hereafter enacted, it shall be the duty of the court convicting the person for a second time, or forfeiting a bond for a second time, or forfeiting a bond or convicting a person after a previous conviction or bond forfeiture for such an offense, to require the defendant to execute bond in the sum of two hundred dollars ($200), after a hearing thereon, to be of good behavior for a period of twelve (12) months insofar as the laws of the State of Arkansas on spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors or beverages affect the defendant.

(b)

Should any person violate the provisions of the bond, the bond, after a hearing thereon, shall be forfeited. The person shall be, for all subsequent violations of the liquor laws or bond forfeitures, placed under a five hundred dollar ($500) bond of the same provisions, to ensure good behavior from the violation of the liquor laws.

(c)

If the bonds provided in this section are not given by the defendant, the defendant shall be committed to the county jail for a period not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months, to be fixed by the court.

(d)

The order of the court requiring the execution of a bond as provided in this section shall be for the preservation of the laws and shall not be considered a part of the punishment inflicted, but as a security against future violations of the provisions of all alcoholic beverage control laws.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 6, § 8; Pope's Dig., § 14141; Acts 1949, No. 143, §§ 1-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-942 — 48-942.3.

Publisher's Notes.

Section 3-8-314 also requires bonds for multiple offenses.

Cross References.

Vinous, spirituous, and malt liquors defined, §3-1-102.

Subchapter 2

— Particular Practices Prohibited

Cross References.

Illegal sales, abatement of nuisance, §16-105-201 et seq.

Permit violations, §3-4-401 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1911, No. 143, §§
4, 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 10: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the repeal of the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States has created an emergency which requires immediate control of intoxicating liquors; and

“Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for the maintenance and development of the State Government and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be effective on its passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

Acts 1941, No. 357, § 6: Mar. 26, 1941. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, it has been ascertained that large quantities of intoxicating liquors are being illegally manufactured and sold in the State of Arkansas and large quantities of intoxicating liquors upon which the state tax has not been paid are also being sold in the State of Arkansas and the state is losing great sums of money in the form of revenue by reason thereof, an emergency is hereby declared and this act shall be in full force and effect immediately from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1943, No. 219, §§ 2, 3: approved Mar. 15, 1943. Emergency clause provided: “The illicit traffic in intoxicating liquor should be discouraged, and as the heavy penalties prescribed by existing law deter conviction by reason of their severity, and more moderate punishment would secure increased conviction, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1943, No. 257, § 4: Mar. 18, 1943. Emergency clause provided: “The Legislature finds as a matter of fact that there are a great many violations of the law with respect to the sale of intoxicating liquor to minors and on Sundays, which, on account of present provisions of the law making such acts felonies, cannot in many cases be enforced; that the practice of selling intoxicating liquor to minors and on Sundays should be stopped and can best be prevented by making such acts misdemeanors.

“Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1947, No. 205, § 3: became law over Governor's veto, Mar. 11, 1947.

Acts 1947, No. 206, § 2: became law over Governor's veto, Mar. 11, 1947.

Acts 1993, No. 875, § 6: Apr. 5, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the penalties under Arkansas law for knowingly and unknowingly furnishing alcoholic beverages to minors are too lenient; that supplying alcoholic beverages to underage persons is strictly contrary to the public policy and is detrimental to the young people of the State; and that the penalties for this conduct should be increased to deter and to punish these violations of Arkansas law and policy. Therefore, in order to properly punish these violations, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2007, No. 1017, § 4: Apr. 3, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that current laws concerning the sale of alcoholic beverages at certain large attendance facilities enact a financial hardship on those facilities; and that a revision to Arkansas law is necessary to ease those hardships and provide a more equitable system of selling alcoholic beverages on certain days and times. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 763, § 6: Apr. 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that Act 294 of 2009 became effective, by emergency clause, on March 3, 2009, and that it has been found that there are some technical corrections that need to be placed into immediate operation. It is further determined that these technical corrections are necessary to give full force and effect to the provisions of Act 294 of 2009 and that if this technical corrections bill is not passed with an emergency clause then unnecessary confusion concerning the provisions of Act 294 of 2009 may arise. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 956, § 34: Apr. 6, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that laws concerning juveniles need to be amended and updated; that the fair and efficient administration of juvenile law is highly important to society at large; and that this act is immediately necessary because the judiciary needs to begin addressing these changes in laws involving juveniles. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-3-201. Unknowingly furnishing or selling to minor.

(a)

Any person who unknowingly sells, gives away, or otherwise disposes of intoxicating liquor or a confectionary containing between five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) and five percent (5%) by volume of alcohol to a minor is guilty of a violation and shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense.

(b)

For the second and subsequent offenses, he or she shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 257, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-902.1; Acts 1993, No. 875, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 332; 2017, No. 1035, § 3.

Publisher's Notes.

The Arkansas Supreme Court, in State v. Jarvis, 244 Ark. 753, 427 S.W.2d 531 (1968), held that this section, which appears to be superseded by §3-3-202 with respect to the offense of knowingly furnishing alcoholic beverages to minors, is still valid with respect to the offense of unknowingly furnishing alcoholic beverages to minors.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment deleted former (a) which read: “The sale, giving away, or other disposition of intoxicating liquor to a minor is declared to be a misdemeanor”; redesignated former (b) as present (a) and (b); in present (a), inserted “unknowingly” and “guilty of a violation and”; and, in present (b), inserted “or she” and substituted “guilty of a Class A misdemeanor” for “punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than one (1) year, or both a fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the jury or court” from the end.

The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “unknowingly sells, gives away, or otherwise disposes of intoxicating liquor or a confectionary containing between five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) and five percent (5%) by volume of alcohol to a minor is” for “shall unknowingly sell, give away, or otherwise dispose of intoxicating liquor to a minor shall be”, and inserted “shall be” preceding “punished”.

Cross References.

Contributing to delinquency of minor, §5-27-220.

3-3-202. Knowingly furnishing or selling to minor.

(a)(1)(A)

It shall be unlawful for any person knowingly to give, procure, or otherwise furnish any alcoholic beverage or a confectionary containing between five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) and five percent (5%) alcohol by volume to any person under twenty-one (21) years of age.

(B)

However, this subsection does not apply to the serving of an alcoholic beverage to the person's family or to the use of wine or beer in any religious ceremony or rite in any established church or religion.

(2)(A)

Upon a first conviction, any person violating this subsection shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

(B)

Upon a second conviction within three (3) years, a person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

(b)(1)

It shall be unlawful for any person knowingly to sell or otherwise furnish for money or other valuable consideration any alcoholic beverage to any person under twenty-one (21) years of age.

(2)(A)

Upon a first conviction, any person violating this subsection shall be guilty of a Class D felony and shall be punished as provided by law.

(B)

Upon a second conviction within five (5) years, a person violating this section shall be deemed guilty of a Class C felony and may be imprisoned or fined, or both as provided by law.

(c)(1)

A warning notice that includes the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be posted in public view in each place of business where alcoholic beverages are sold.

(2)

The warning notice shall be posted in a manner prescribed by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 277, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-903; Acts 1993, No. 875, § 2; 1995, No. 446, § 1; 2005, No. 1767, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 405; 2009, No. 352, § 1; 2009, No. 948, § 1; 2017, No. 1035, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “Class C misdemeanor” for “misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned for not more than ten (10) days, or both fined and imprisoned” in (a)(2)(A); and substituted “Class D felony” for “felony and may be imprisoned in the Department of Corrections for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years and shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both” in (a)(2)(B).

The 2009 amendment by No. 352 substituted “this subsection shall not apply to the serving of an alcoholic beverage to the person's” for “this section shall not apply to the serving of such to one's” in (a)(1) and changed “Class C misdemeanor” to “Class A misdemeanor” in (a)(2)(A).

The 2009 amendment by No. 948 inserted “or beer” in (a)(1).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a)(1) as (a)(1)(A) and (a)(1)(B); inserted “or a confectionary containing between five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) and five percent (5%) alcohol by volume” in (a)(1)(A); and substituted “does not” for “shall not” in (a)(1)(B).

Cross References.

Sales of beer or wine to minors by beer permittees prohibited, §§3-5-221,3-5-307.

3-3-203. Purchase or possession by minor.

(a)(1)

It is unlawful for any person under twenty-one (21) years of age to purchase or have in his or her possession any intoxicating liquor, wine, or beer.

(2)

For the purposes of this section, intoxicating liquor, wine, or beer in the body of a person under twenty-one (21) years of age is deemed to be in his or her possession.

(b)

It is unlawful for an adult to purchase on behalf of a person under twenty-one (21) years of age any intoxicating liquor, wine, beer, or a confectionary containing between five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) and five percent (5%) alcohol by volume.

(c)

A person eighteen (18) years of age or older violating this section is guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(d)

In addition to the penalties provided in this section, the trial judge or magistrate may impose the following penalty or penalties or any combination thereof:

(1)

Require a person eighteen (18) years of age or older but under twenty-one (21) years of age to write themes or essays on intoxicating liquors, wine, or beer; and

(2)

Place a person eighteen (18) years of age or older but under twenty-one (21) years of age under probationary conditions as determined by the court in its reasonable discretion designed as a reasonable and suitable preventive and educational safeguard to prevent future violations of this section by the person.

(e)(1)

In addition to the fine authorized by subsection (c) of this section, at the time of arrest of a person eighteen (18) years of age or older for violation of the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the arrested person shall immediately surrender his or her license, permit, or other evidence of driving privilege to the arresting law enforcement officer as provided in §5-65-402.

(2)(A)

The Office of Driver Services or its designated official shall suspend or revoke the driving privilege of the arrested person or shall suspend any nonresident driving privilege of the arrested person, as provided in §5-65-402.

(B)

The period of suspension or revocation shall be based on the offense that caused the surrender of the arrested person's license, permit, or other evidence of driving privilege as described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section and the number of any previous offenses as follows:

(i)

Suspension for sixty (60) days for a first offense under subsection (a) of this section;

(ii)

Suspension for one hundred twenty (120) days for a second offense under subsection (a) of this section; and

(iii)

Suspension for one (1) year for a third or subsequent offense under subsection (a) of this section.

(3)

In order to determine the number of previous offenses to consider when suspending or revoking the arrested person's driving privileges, the office shall consider as a previous offense any conviction under subsection (a) of this section which occurred either prior to or after August 12, 2005.

(f)

A person under eighteen (18) years of age who violates this section is subject to the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq.

(g)(1)

A person under twenty-one (21) years of age is immune from criminal prosecution under subsection (a) of this section if:

(A)

The person:

(i)

Requested emergency medical assistance in response to a medical emergency of another person;

(ii)

Remained on the scene until the emergency medical assistance arrived; and

(iii)

Cooperated with emergency medical assistance providers and law enforcement personnel during the medical emergency;

(B)

The person is the recipient of emergency medical assistance requested under subdivision (g)(1)(A) of this section; or

(C)

The person acted in concert with the person initiating contact for emergency medical assistance and met the requirements of subdivisions (g)(1)(A)(ii) and (iii) of this section.

(2)

This subsection does not apply if the request for emergency medical assistance does not occur until after law enforcement personnel have arrived at the scene of the medical emergency.

(3)

The immunity from criminal prosecution provided under this section shall not in any way affect a law enforcement officer's or court's probable cause determination in regard to another criminal offense.

(h)

It is not an offense under this section if the minor was acting at the direction of an authorized agent of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division to enforce or ensure compliance with laws relating to the prohibition of the possession of an alcoholic beverage by a minor or the sale of an alcoholic beverage to a minor.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 44, § 1; 1979, No. 61, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-903.1; Acts 1997, No. 1210, § 1; 2005, No. 1535, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 28; 2009, No. 956, § 1; 2011, No. 1152, § 1; 2013, No. 1123, § 1; 2015, No. 381, § 1; 2017, No. 925, § 1; 2017, No. 1035, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment by No. 1535 added present (e).

The 2005 amendment by No. 1994 substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (c); and added “and” at the end of (d)(1).

The 2009 amendment substituted “A person eighteen (18) years of age or older” for “Any person” in (c); substituted “eighteen (18) years of age or older but under twenty-one” for “under twenty-one” in (d)(1) and (d)(2); inserted “ of a person eighteen (18) years of age or older” in (e)(1); and added (f).

The 2011 amendment substituted “It is unlawful” for “It shall be unlawful” in (a)(1); and substituted “is deemed” for “shall not be deemed” in (a)(2).

The 2013 amendment substituted “person under twenty-one (21) years of age” for “minor” in (a)(2).

The 2015 amendment substituted “under” for “less than” in (f); and added (g).

The 2017 amendment by No. 925 added (h).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1035, in (b), substituted “is unlawful” for “shall also be unlawful”; and added “or a confectionary containing between five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) and five percent (5%) alcohol by volume”.

3-3-204. Handling by minor.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) or subsection (c) of this section, it is unlawful for a wholesaler, retailer, or transporter of alcoholic beverages to allow an employee or any other person under twenty-one (21) years of age to have anything to do with the selling, transporting, or handling of an alcoholic beverage.

(b)

With the written consent of a parent or guardian, a person eighteen (18) years of age and older may:

(1)

Sell or otherwise handle beer and wine at retail grocery establishments; or

(2)

Be employed by a licensed liquor wholesaler or licensed beer wholesaler or by a licensed native winery to handle alcoholic beverages at the place of business of the licensed wholesaler or winery.

(c)

A person nineteen (19) years of age and older may sell and handle alcoholic beverages at a restaurant, private club, hotel, or motel that is licensed for on-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages under this chapter.

(d)(1)

A person who violates this section is guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(2)

The violation shall be grounds for suspension, cancellation, or revocation by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of any permit issued to the person by the director.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 129, §§ 1, 2; 1983, No. 527, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-903.2, 48-903.3; Acts 1987, No. 515, § 1; 1999, No. 1169, § 1; 2001, No. 1553, § 3; 2003, No. 1807, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 28; 2009, No. 294, § 1; 2013, No. 527, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (d)(1).

The 2009 amendment substituted “§3-9-301” for “§3-9-501” in (c).

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

Cross References.

Revocation and suspension procedure generally, §§3-2-212 —3-2-217.

3-3-205. Sale or possession without license.

(a)(1)

Any person who shall sell, barter, exchange, or give any intoxicating alcoholic liquor without having a valid license as provided by this act, in addition to losing his or her license, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

(2)

Any person found guilty of a third or subsequent violation of this subsection within a period of three (3) years shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

(b)

Any person who has in his or her possession intoxicating alcoholic liquor not obtained under and in conformity with the provisions of this act shall be deemed guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

(c)

This penalty shall apply whether the intoxicating liquor is for the use of the person illegally possessing it or for the use and benefit of another.

(d)

Each act in violation of this section shall constitute a separate misdemeanor.

(e)

Nothing contained in this section shall relieve any licensee from forfeiture of his or her license.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 218, §§ 2-4; 1947, No. 205, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-902, 48-912, 48-913; Acts 1991, No. 498, § 1; 1991, No. 577, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 436.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment redesignated former (a) as present (a)(1); inserted “or her” in present (a)(1), (b) and (e); deleted “and upon conviction shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1000), or imprisoned for not exceeding one (1) year, or both so fined and imprisoned in the discretion of the court or jury” from the end of present (a)(1); added (a)(2); deleted “and shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1000) or imprisoned for not exceeding one (1) year, or both so fined and imprisoned in the discretion of the court or jury” from the end of (b); and deleted former (f).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1943, No. 218, §§ 1, 3, and 4 repealed Acts 1941, No. 356, §§ 1, 3, and 4 and enacted provisions identical to Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 6, §§ 1, 12, and 13 which had been repealed by Acts 1941, No. 356. Further, Acts 1943, No. 218, § 2 repealed Acts 1941, No. 356, § 2 and enacted provisions substantially the same as the first paragraph of Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 6, § 2, except that the penalty provisions were reduced from a range of five hundred dollars to one thousand dollars to a range of fifty dollars to five hundred dollars.

Therefore, as used in this section “this act” probably means Acts 1935, No. 108, which is codified as §§3-1-101 —3-1-103,3-2-101,3-2-205,3-3-101 —3-3-103,3-3-212,3-3-401,3-3-404,3-3-405,3-4-101 —3-4-103,3-4-201,3-4-202,3-4-207 —3-4-211,3-4-213,3-4-214,3-4-215 [repealed],3-4-217,3-4-219,3-4-220,3-4-301 —3-4-303,3-4-501,3-4-503,3-4-601 —3-4-605,3-8-301,3-8-302 [repealed],3-8-303,3-8-304 [repealed],3-8-305 —3-8-310,3-8-311 [repealed],3-8-313 —3-8-317,23-12-708.

Cross References.

Misdemeanors, §5-1-107.

Sale, etc., in dry territory, §3-8-312.

Sale of beer without permit, §3-5-210.

3-3-206. Sale or delivery to retailer without valid license tax receipt.

(a)

Any manufacturer or jobber who shall sell or deliver intoxicating liquor within the state to a retailer who does not possess a valid license tax receipt, as provided for in this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b)(1)

For the first offense, he or she shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

(2)

Any person found guilty a second time shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 218, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-901, 48-902; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 462.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment, in (a), inserted “or she,” substituted “guilty of a Class B misdemeanor” for “fined not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months, or both so fined and imprisoned within the discretion of the court or jury” at the end of the second sentence, and deleted the former last sentence; and substituted “guilty of a Class A misdemeanor” for “fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or confined in the county jail not less than one (1) month nor more than six (6) months, or both so fined and imprisoned within the discretion of the court or jury” at the end of (b).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-3-205.

3-3-207. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The amendment to this section by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 366, was superseded by the repeal of this section by Acts 2005, No. 541, § 1. As amended by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 366, this section read:

“3-3-207. Sales to persons failing to provide for families.

“(a)

Any person who shall sell intoxicating alcoholic liquor to any person who has been reported to the seller, by the juvenile court or any officer acting by its discretion, as failing to make a proper provision for his or her family shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor. The penalties prescribed herein shall be in addition to any other penalty prescribed by law.

“(b)

Any person found guilty a second time shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.”

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning sales of alcohol to persons failing to provide for families, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 541, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1943, No. 218, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-901, 48-902.

3-3-208. Possession or procuring orders.

(a)

Any person who, by himself, herself, his or her employee, servant, agent for himself or herself, or any other person, shall keep or carry on his or her person or in any vehicle or leave in a place for another to secure any intoxicating alcoholic liquor with the intent to sell the liquor in violation of this act or who shall within this state in any manner, directly or indirectly, solicit, take, or accept any order for the purchase, sale, shipment, or delivery of intoxicating liquor for beverage purposes in violation of the requirements of this act shall be guilty of a violation.

(b)(1)

He or she shall be fined not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense.

(2)

For the second and subsequent offenses, he or she shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

(c)

The penalties prescribed herein shall be in addition to any other penalty prescribed by law.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 218, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-901; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 210.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” at the end of (a); substituted “Class A misdemeanor” for “misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or to imprisonment in the county jail for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than one (1) year, or subject to both fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court or jury” in (b)(2); and made gender neutral changes throughout.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-3-205.

3-3-209. Furnishing to alcoholics or intoxicated persons.

Any person who shall sell, give away, or dispose of intoxicating liquor to an habitual drunkard or an intoxicated person shall be guilty of a violation and for the first offense be punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). For the second and subsequent offenses, he or she shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. The penalties prescribed in this section shall be in addition to any other penalty prescribed by law.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 218, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-901; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 333.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in the first sentence; and in the second sentence, inserted “or she” and “Class A” and deleted “and punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than six (6) months nor more than one (1) year, or both so fined and imprisoned in the discretion of the court or jury” from the end.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-3-205.

3-3-210. Sale on Sunday or early weekday mornings.

(a)(1)

A person who sells intoxicating alcoholic liquor on Sunday, except as such sales are authorized by §§3-9-215 and3-9-216, and subdivision (a)(3) of this section, or between 1:00 a.m. and 7:00 a.m. on weekdays is guilty of a violation and for the first offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(2)

For the second and subsequent offenses, the person is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

(3)

A person that holds a permit that allows on-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages may operate on Sundays between the hours of 10:00 a.m. and 12:00 midnight.

(4)(A)

A city, town, or county may establish by ordinance a lesser period of time than provided in subdivision (a)(3) of this section during which on-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages may occur at on-premises outlets.

(B)

The city, town, or county ordinance shall specify the on-premises outlets that are subject to the more restrictive hours of operation on a Sunday.

(5)

A violation of a more restrictive city, town, or county ordinance is not an administrative violation against the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division on-premises consumption permit and shall be treated and disposed of under §3-4-407.

(6)

The hours of operation of private club permitted establishments shall continue to be controlled by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division rules.

(b)(1)(A)

As a further exception to the Sunday sales prohibition set out in subsection (a) of this section, counties and cities in the state may refer to the voters at an election the issue of whether to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption on Sundays between the hours of 10:00 a.m. and 12:00 midnight or within a lesser period within the hours as may be provided under a referendum election conducted in accordance with the following:

(i)

A referendum election may be called in a city by a petition filed with the city clerk signed by fifteen percent (15%) of the qualified electors who cast a vote in the city for the Office of Governor in the last general election in which the office appeared on the ballot; or

(ii)

A referendum election may be called in a county by a petition filed with the county clerk signed by fifteen percent (15%) of the qualified electors who cast a vote in the county for the Office of Governor in the last general election in which the office appeared on the ballot.

(B)

The Sunday sale of alcoholic beverages authorized in this subsection shall be limited to those businesses within the county or city that possess a current and valid license for the sale of alcoholic beverages issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(2)(A)

The election under this subsection shall be conducted on a citywide or countywide basis.

(B)

All qualified electors within the city or county, as the case may be, shall be eligible to vote even though they may reside in a dry area.

(C)

The election under this subsection on the Sunday sales question shall be held in accordance with the procedures established for on-premises consumption elections by §3-9-201 et seq., and the ballot for the election shall be printed substantially as follows:

“( ) FOR THE OFF-PREMISES SALE OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ON SUNDAY IN (NAME OF CITY OR COUNTY), ARKANSAS, AS AUTHORIZED BY LAW.

( ) AGAINST THE OFF-PREMISES SALE OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ON SUNDAY IN (NAME OF CITY OR COUNTY), ARKANSAS, AS AUTHORIZED BY LAW.”.

(3)(A)

The vote of the majority of the electors in a citywide election approving Sunday sales shall authorize the sales in all permitted outlets located within the incorporated areas of the city only.

(B)

The vote of the majority of the electors in a countywide election approving Sunday sales shall authorize the sales in all permitted outlets located anywhere within the county.

(4)

The vote of the majority of the electors against the off-premises sale of alcoholic beverages on Sunday has no effect on sales of mixed drinks in hotels and restaurants as authorized by §3-9-215 or §3-9-216 or any other on-premises-consumption permitted outlet.

(c)

Notwithstanding the authority granted to counties and cities in this section, wholesale distributors of intoxicating alcoholic liquor may not sell or deliver any alcoholic beverages to retailers on a Sunday.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 218, § 1; 1959, No. 56, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-901; Acts 1989, No. 426, § 1; 1999, No. 857, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 367; 2007, No. 1017, § 1; 2009, No 294, § 2; 2009, No. 763, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment inserted the subdivision designations in (a); substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (a)(1); and, in (a)(2), inserted “Class B” and deleted “and punished by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in the county jail for no fewer than ten (10) days nor more than six (6) months or both so fined and imprisoned in the discretion of the court or jury” from the end.

The 2007 amendment inserted “3-9-216” and made related changes in (a)(1).

The 2009 amendment by No. 294, in (a), substituted “subdivision (a)(3) of this section” for “3-9-401 et seq.” in (a)(1), and inserted (a)(3); rewrote (b); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 763 inserted (a)(4) through (a)(6).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-3-205.

3-3-211. Sales on Christmas Day.

(a)

It shall be unlawful to sell intoxicating liquors on Christmas Day.

(b)

Any person who shall sell intoxicating alcoholic liquors on Christmas Day shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 266, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-950, 48-951; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 367.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment, in (b), inserted “Class B” and deleted “and shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned in the county jail for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months, or both so fined and imprisoned within the discretion of the court or jury.”